Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 9 Pilots — Rhode Island Sound, Narragansett Bay, Sakonnet River, and Tributaries

46-9-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be the policy and intent of the general assembly and the purpose of this chapter:

To provide maximum safety from the dangers of navigation for vessels entering or leaving the waters of this state;

To maintain a state pilotage system devoted to the preservation and protection of lives, property, and vessels entering or leaving waters of this state at the highest standard of efficiency; and

To insure an adequate supply of pilots well qualified for the discharge of their duties.

The general assembly recognizes, finds, and declares that it is the policy of the State of Rhode Island that the waters, harbors and ports of the State of Rhode Island are important resources, and it is deemed necessary in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare to provide laws regulating the piloting of vessels utilizing the navigable waters of the state in order that the resources, the environment, life, and property may be protected to the fullest extent possible.

The general assembly further finds and declares that it is a policy of the State of Rhode Island to have pilots experienced in the handling of vessels aboard vessels in certain of the state waters with prescribed qualifications and licenses issued by the state.

It is further the intent of the general assembly not to place in jeopardy Rhode Island’s position as an able competitor for waterborne commerce from other ports and nations of the world, but rather to continue to develop and encourage that commerce.

It is the further intent of the general assembly to regulate pilots, piloting, and pilotage to the full extent of any congressional grant of authority, except as limited in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-2.
Vessels required to employ state licensed pilot — “Vessel” defined.

Every foreign vessel, regardless of gross tonnage or draft, and every American vessel under register, regardless of gross tonnage or draft, and every other vessel not exempted by §

46-9-3

, or the laws of the United States, entering or departing from any port of the state or traversing the waters of the state north of a line drawn from Point Judith to Sakonnet Point, shall take and employ a pilot licensed under this chapter and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter; and the vessel, its master, owner, agent, or consignee shall be liable for any pay pilotage rates in accordance with the pilotage rates established by the pilotage commission or which may be established under the provisions of this chapter; and the vessels shall be subject to regulations established by the pilotage commission, which commission is established under §

46-9-5

.

Unless otherwise provided, as used in this chapter, the word “vessel” means every description of watercraft or other artificial contraption used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water and measuring one thousand (1,000) gross tons or more, and capable of loading to a draft of twelve feet (12´) or more, and every foreign ship, boat, barge, vessel, and watercraft, regardless of gross tonnage or draft, and every American ship, boat, barge, vessel, and watercraft under register, regardless of gross tonnage or draft.

Notwithstanding any of the above provisions, any vessel carrying or towing a barge or similar conveyance carrying more than one thousand (1,000) gross tons of any oil, petroleum, petroleum distillate, or any by-product thereof, shall be defined as a vessel and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 5.

46-9-3.
Vessels exempt from chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to vessels navigating under a certificate of enrollment under the control of a federally licensed pilot or to vessels otherwise exempt by the laws of the United States, or to vessels measuring less than one thousand (1,000) gross tons, and the draft of which, when fully loaded, would be less than twelve feet (12´) of water, other than vessels under registry. All vessels under registry are subject to the provisions of this chapter. If any vessel exempt from this chapter shall employ a pilot, the pilot shall be entitled to receive, as compensation for his or her services, pilotage fees in an amount not to exceed the rates established by the commission. Vessels are not subject to the provisions of this chapter if they receive special exemption from the commission where the commission determines that the vessels do not pose a threat to the environment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-4.
Piloting without license.

It shall be unlawful for any person not licensed as a pilot under this chapter to pilot or offer to pilot a vessel not exempt from the provisions of this chapter. It shall likewise be unlawful for any person on board a tug or towboat to tow a vessel not exempt from the provisions of this chapter, unless the vessel shall have on board, or be under the control of, a duly licensed state pilot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-4.1.
Piloting without charts.

It shall be unlawful for any pilot to pilot any vessel, including a tug, without having in his or her possession on the vessel being piloted current charts of all waters through which the vessel is being piloted. Likewise, it shall be unlawful for any tug to tow any barge or other craft of any size without first having on board, and available for use, current charts of all waters through which the barge or other craft is being towed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 230, § 1.

46-9-5.
Pilotage commission.

There is hereby created a state pilotage commission within the department of environmental management independent of the department and the director, consisting of four (4) members, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the governor. Of the members appointed by the governor, one shall be a licensed pilot with five (5) years active service on the waters of this state, and one shall represent the public. The associate director of the bureau of natural resources within the department of environmental management, or his or her designee, and the director of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee, shall serve as ex officio members of the commission. Each appointed member of the commission shall serve for a term of three (3) years and until his or her successor shall be appointed and qualified. In the month of February, the governor shall appoint a member to hold office until the first day of March in the third year of his or her appointment, and until his or her successor shall be appointed and qualified to succeed the member whose term shall next expire.

Gubernatorial appointments made under this section after the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006] shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate.

Any vacancy which may occur in the commission shall be filled by the governor as in the case of an original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. Any member shall be eligible to succeed himself or herself.

Newly appointed and qualified public members and designees of ex-officio members shall, within six (6) months of their qualification or designation, attend a training course that shall be developed with commission approval and conducted by the chair of the commission and shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 46-9, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2 and the commission’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

Members of the commission shall be removable by the governor pursuant to §

36-1-7

of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reason unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 32; P.L. 2006, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 33, § 1.

46-9-6.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall perform the duties and have the powers set forth in this section as well as other duties and powers as may be provided by law:

To make, establish, and enforce rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, which shall be binding and effectual upon all pilots licensed by the commission, all vessels subject to this chapter, and all parties employing the pilots; and, from time to time, revise or amend the rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable the commission to carry into effect and enforce the provisions of this chapter; the rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, those rules and regulations necessary to enable the commission to respond to emergencies or catastrophic conditions as may occur, whether environmental or otherwise. The rules and regulations shall formalize and detail the authority of the commission over individual bay pilots in relation to other state, federal, and municipal agencies, and any other public safety programs;

To make and establish rates of pilotage for vessels that are subject to the provisions of this chapter;

To establish and determine the qualifications of any person applying for a pilot’s license and conduct examination;

To issue, suspend, or revoke any pilot’s license in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

To take any action that is necessary to cause the laws, rules, and regulations concerning pilots and pilotage matters to be fully observed and executed;

To hear and decide complaints made in writing against any pilot, pilot’s agent or employee, or person subject to the provisions of this chapter for any misbehavior or neglect of or breach of rules or regulations of the commission which it shall deem material to be investigated;

To hear and decide complaints made in writing by any pilot against any charterer, owner, agent, master, or sailor of a vessel for any misbehavior toward that pilot in the performance of the pilot’s duty, or for any breach of the rules and regulations;

To have the power and authority to take testimony and evidence and administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses and issue and serve witness subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum at any hearings that it may conduct; provided, further, that the commission shall conduct at least one public hearing annually, duly advertised, to hear and receive complaints and comments from individual pilots, associations, or other public or private agencies with regard to any matters that may properly come within the jurisdiction of the commission;

To make an annual report to the director of the department of environmental management for the preceding calendar year, together with the amounts of pilotage collected by the pilots and the amounts paid to the state. The report shall also include but not be limited to:

A review and synopsis of commission activities and administrative proceedings;

A fiscal report and recommendations on fee collections;

A synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the commission;

A review of goals established and findings and recommendations on commission activity.

To establish criteria for the training, experience, ability, knowledge, aptitude, skill, and professional qualifications of pilots and establish and determine the training, experience, ability, knowledge, aptitude, skill, and professional qualifications requirements necessary to make any person eligible to apply for a pilot’s license and to conduct examinations, and, in this connection, to appoint a special board of state licensed pilots to supervise the training and instructions of those persons seeking eligibility to apply for a pilot’s license, and to certify their experience, competency, ability, knowledge, skill, aptitude, education, and training in accordance with criteria established by the commission and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission;

To require an applicant for a license or a licensed pilot to submit proof of the applicant’s mental or physical capability to serve or continue to serve;

To institute proceedings in the appropriate courts in this state to restrain and enjoin actions when any violation of this chapter or rule promulgated thereunder has occurred or is threatened by any person;

To require holders of licenses or certificates, and applicants for licenses or certificates, to submit pertinent information under oath necessary to determine their qualifications or to enforce the provisions of this chapter;

To regulate the station and operation of any pilot boat within the waters of the state used for the purpose of boarding or disembarking any pilot and to designate the areas in which the vessels shall be boarded or left by the pilots; and

To require the reporting of all maritime accidents pursuant to the regulations of the commission.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the commission; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to subsection

46-9-5(d)

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

of the Rhode Island general laws. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 33, § 1.

46-9-7.
Qualifications for original license.

Every person who shall apply for an original license to act as a pilot in the waters of this state north of a line drawn from Point Judith to Sakonnet Point shall be a citizen or legal resident of the United States; shall possess a master’s license of unlimited tonnage, (any oceans) issued by a duly constituted authority of the United States; shall possess a federal first-class pilot’s endorsement covering the section of the waters of this state required by commission rules; shall possess a state’s pilot’s license for the waters of Block Island Sound; shall have completed training in his or her duties as a pilot over the route under the supervision of the board of state licensed pilots appointed by the commission for this purpose pursuant to commission rules; and shall conform to physical and mental standards and possess professional experience and qualifications as the commission shall, from time to time, establish and require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 111; P.L. 1996, ch. 164, § 8.

46-9-8.
Regulation of pilot boats.

Every vessel, boat, or launch of any draft, size, or tonnage, used for the purpose of transporting from the Rhode Island shoreline to a vessel in Narragansett Bay south of the Newport and Jamestown Bridges or, in Rhode Island Sound and in Block Island Sound, a pilot or any person intending to pilot a vessel shall be in compliance with the rules and regulations established by the state pilotage commission regarding the construction, safety, equipment, manning, and operations of the vessel, boat, or launch; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the jurisdiction of the commission to regulate the vessels, boats, or launches in other waters subject to this chapter. Further, the owner or operator of the vessel, boat, or launch shall secure and hold a current certificate of compliance issued by the state pilotage commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-9.
Temporary pilot licenses — Emergencies.

In the event of a national or domestic emergency, the commission may issue temporary pilot licenses, to persons not meeting the qualifications in §

46-9-7

, to serve as long as the emergency shall exist or until such time as the pilots so licensed can be replaced by persons meeting the qualifications prescribed in §

46-9-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-10.
Examination of applicants.

The commission shall conduct the examination of applicants for pilot’s licenses, at a time and place as it shall, after due notice, direct. It shall examine the applicants with relation to their qualifications for the office of pilot. Each applicant shall be examined in particular concerning his or her knowledge of the tides, depths, bearings, and distances of the shoals, rocks, bars, and points of land and night lights in the navigation for which he or she applies for a license to act as pilot, and also touching any other matter relating thereto which the commission may deem proper.

If, upon examination, the commission finds the person so applying to:

Possess the requisite physical and mental standards;

Be of good character and temperate habits; and

Have sufficient ability, knowledge, aptitude, and skill, and professional experience, and to have satisfied the requisites of §

46-9-7

, the commission shall grant him or her such class of license to act as pilot as it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-11.
Deferment of applications for future examination.

If the commission, after a public hearing duly called, deems that the number of licensed pilots is sufficient to meet the demands of commerce in the waters of this state, it shall place the names of the subsequent applicants on file for future examination and licensing in the order in which the applications are filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-12.
Duration and renewal of licenses.

Any license issued under this chapter shall run for a period of five (5) years from the date of issue thereof unless otherwise terminated, revoked, or suspended. Licenses may be renewed in accordance with the procedures set forth in the commission’s rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-13.
License fees.

Every application for a license to act as a pilot in the waters of this state shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) payable to the State of Rhode Island. Every pilot who shall request a renewal of his or her license shall pay to the State of Rhode Island a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 5.

46-9-14.
Fall River pilots.

A person holding a Massachusetts pilot’s license for the port of Fall River may, upon application to the commission and payment of a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) to the State of Rhode Island and satisfactorily passing an examination given by the commission under this chapter covering those waters in Rhode Island which are normally used by shipping when entering or departing from the port of Fall River, be issued a Rhode Island license limited to those waters of the state for which he or she was examined, and the issuance of this license shall also be subject to such other provisions of this chapter as the commission shall deem applicable; provided, however, that the holder of the license shall not cause any vessel to stop at any Rhode Island port.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-15.
Prior licensees.

Any person holding a pilot’s license which was valid on May 26, 1981, shall be deemed to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-16.
Pilot’s bond.

No person shall receive a license or exercise the office of pilot until he or she has given to the general treasurer of the State of Rhode Island a bond with two (2) sureties to be approved by the commission, or a surety bond of a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office and upon compliance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-17.
Liability for fees.

The master, owner, agent, or consignee entering or clearing a vessel at any port in this state shall be jointly and severally liable for pilotage fees at the rates prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-18.
Lien for pilotage fees.

Every licensed pilot shall have a lien for his or her pilotage fees, for the period of one year, upon the hull and appurtenances of any vessel liable to him or her therefore.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-19.
Commissions prohibited.

No master, agent, owner, or consignee shall charge a commission or receive any payment, directly or indirectly, for the assignment of pilotage, nor shall any pilot pay or offer to pay to any person any commission for the assignment of pilotage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-20.
Accounts of fees — Payments to state — Use of funds.

Once every month every pilot or his or her agent shall render to the commission an accurate account of all vessels subject to this chapter piloted by him or her, and of all money received by him or her for pilotage of those vessels, and shall pay to the State of Rhode Island a percentage of the amount thereof. The percentage shall be established by rule and regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter. Pilots shall add a percentage to the rates established by the commission when they perform the service of piloting any vessel subject to this chapter and collect the percentage in like manner as they are authorized to collect pilotage fees.

The general treasurer shall deposit those amounts payable to the State of Rhode Island under this section into the general fund as general revenue. General revenues shall be appropriated for use by the department for the following purposes:

To monitor the transit of vessels into, through, and out of Narragansett Bay;

To monitor pilots as they conduct vessels into, through, and out of Narragansett Bay;

To fund and support programs and activities to promote and ensure the safe guidance of ships into, through, and out of Narragansett Bay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 154.

46-9-21.
Payment of pilotage fees.

The master, owner, or operator of every vessel subject to this chapter shall make available to the local agent on the vessel’s arrival, pilotage fees as part of the vessel’s port performance payments for expeditious disbursement to the attending pilots. The payment of the pilotage fees may be demanded on the vessel’s departure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-22.
Grounds for disciplinary action.

The commission may suspend any pilot for any period that it may deem proper, and may revoke and annul any pilot’s license which shall be issued under this chapter, upon satisfactory proof that:

The pilot has willfully disobeyed or violated the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation made and established by the commission; or

The pilot has negligently lost or damaged any vessel under his or her care; or

The pilot is so addicted to the habits of intoxication, or the use of any drug, as to be unfit to be entrusted with the charge of a vessel; or

The pilot is so mentally or physically incapable as to be unfit to carry on the duties of a pilot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-22.1.
Grounds for minor disciplinary action.

The commission may suspend any pilot’s license for a period of not to exceed three (3) months upon satisfactory proof that:

The pilot took charge of a vessel drawing more water than his or her license authorized; or

The pilot has been guilty of any misconduct or neglect of duty detrimental to the business of piloting; or

The pilot neglects or refuses to appear, without justifiable cause, before the commission after having been duly notified to appear.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-22.2.
Chemical test — Consent — Administration — Use as evidence — Refusal to submit.

Any pilot who operates a vessel within the waters of this state shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to a chemical test of his or her breath, blood, and/or urine for the purpose of determining the chemical content of his or her body fluids or breath, provided that the test shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been operating a vessel within the waters of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination thereof. The director of the department of health is empowered to make and file with the secretary of state, regulations which prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath, and the qualifications and certification of individuals authorized to administer such testing and analysis. When a person is required to submit to a blood test, only a physician or registered nurse or a medical technician certified under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of health may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content therein. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath or urine specimens. The person tested shall be permitted as soon as reasonably possible to have a physician of his or her own choosing and at his or her own expense administer a chemical test of his or her breath, blood, and/or urine in addition to the one administered at the direction of the law enforcement officer.

In any criminal prosecution for a violation of any provision of this chapter, evidence as to the amount of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination thereof, in the defendant’s blood at the time alleged as shown by a chemical analysis of the defendant’s breath, blood, or urine or other bodily substance, shall be admissible and competent, provided, that the defendant has consented to the taking of the test upon which the analysis is made. Evidence that the defendant had refused to submit to the test shall not be admissible unless the defendant elects to testify, and that additional competent evidence is presented bearing on the question whether or not the defendant was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination thereof.

If any pilot refuses, upon the request of a law enforcement officer or any agent of the commission, to submit to a test as provided in subsection (a) above, none shall be given, but the commission, if it finds that the law enforcement officer or commission agent had reasonable grounds to believe the pilot had been operating a vessel within the waters of this state under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination thereof, that the defendant has been informed of his or her rights in accordance with subsections (a) and (b), above, that the defendant was afforded a reasonable opportunity to exercise those rights, that the defendant had been informed of the penalties incurred as a result of noncompliance with this section, and that the person has refused to submit to the test upon request of the law enforcement officer or commission agent, shall, from the date of the official order of suspension, impose a mandatory license suspension of six (6) months for the first violation, and a mandatory license suspension of one year for the second violation; provided, however, that the commission may suspend for a longer period or revoke or annul the license of any pilot charged with a violation of this section, if presented with competent evidence bearing and upon satisfactory proof that the pilot has violated the provisions of §

46-9-22

or §

46-9-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 363, § 1.

46-9-23.
Contest — Notice and opportunity to be heard.

Whenever there is a contested case concerning the granting, denial, revocation, or other action concerning a pilot’s license, the commission shall provide the pilot with notice and an opportunity to be heard, and shall, in this respect, and all others concerning the contested case, conform to the practices required by the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-24.
Reinstatement following suspension.

Any pilot whose license has been suspended may, following the expiration of the period of his or her suspension, be eligible for the reinstatement of his or her license; subject to any conditions that may be imposed by the commission in accordance with this chapter and subject to any rules and regulations that may be in effect at that time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-25.
Appeals from commission.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the commission under the provisions of this chapter may obtain judicial review under the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-26.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commission pursuant thereto, shall be subject to a civil penalty, to be assessed by the commission, of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance thereof shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-27.
Criminal penalty for intentional or grossly negligent violation — Felony.

Any person who shall intentionally, or through grossly negligent behavior, violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission under the provisions of this chapter or any order issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter or any person who shall cause the violation, shall be deemed guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-28.
Penalties — Misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order adopted or issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both; and every such person shall be deemed guilty of a separate and distinct offense for each day during which the violation shall be repeated or continued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-29.
Proceedings for enforcement — Injunctive relief.

The superior court for Providence County shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter and any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto. Proceedings for enforcement may be instituted and prosecuted in the name of the chairperson of the commission, and in any proceeding in which injunctive relief is sought, it shall not be necessary for the chairperson to show that, without the relief, the injury which will result will be irreparable, or that the remedy at law is inadequate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-30.
Surrender of suspended or revoked license.

A pilot whose license has been revoked or suspended shall surrender his or her license to the commission who shall retain it until the period of his or her suspension shall expire.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-31.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment thereof or so much thereof as may be necessary from time to time upon duly authenticated vouchers approved by the chairperson of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-32.
Quarters and personnel for commission.

The director of the department of environmental management shall provide the commission with quarters for its activities and shall furnish the commission with secretarial and other personnel as shall be required by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-33.
Repealed.

46-9-34.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or determination made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person, agency, or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, regulation, or determination and the application of the provisions to other persons, agencies, or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 388, § 2.

46-9-35.
Inspection — Fees.

The director of the department of environmental management shall have the authority to inspect all vessels on behalf of the pilotage commission for the purpose of enforcing this chapter. The director shall charge a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each vessel so inspected. The director shall place all money collected pursuant to this section into a restricted receipt account entitled the “Vessel Pilot Inspection Program” and shall use the money collected to support activities under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 324, § 6.